Utah statutes.
20A-13-103.   Omissions from maps -- How resolved.

(1)  If any area of the state is omitted from a Congressional district in the Congressional block assignment file enacted by the Legislature, the county clerk of the affected county, upon discovery of the omission, shall attach the area to the appropriate Congressional district according to the requirements of Subsections (2) and (3).

(2)  If the omitted area is surrounded by a single Congressional district, the county clerk shall attach the area to that district.

(3)  If the omitted area is contiguous to two or more Congressional districts, the county clerk shall attach the area to the district that has the least population, as determined by the official census population figures and maps described in Subsection 20A-13-101.5(2).

(4) The county clerk shall certify in writing and file with the lieutenant governor any attachment made under this section.



Amended by Chapter 8, 2011 Special Session 3

